Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 41. CARRIER PERMIT

Sec. 41.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) The holder of a carrier permit may transport liquor into and out of this state and between points within the state.

(b) The holder may transport liquor from one wet area to another wet area across a dry area if that course of transportation is necessary or convenient.

(c) The holder of a carrier permit who transports liquor to the premises of a wholesaler, including to a location from which the wholesaler is temporarily conducting business under Section 109.62, shall provide to the consignee a shipping invoice that clearly states:

(1) the name and address of the consignor and consignee;

(2) the origin and destination of the shipment; and

(3) any other information required by this code or commission rule, including the brands, sizes of containers, types, and quantities of liquor contained in the shipment.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 455, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 517 (H.B. 2035), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 41.03. ELIGIBILITY FOR PERMIT. A carrier permit may be issued to:

(1) a water carrier;

(2) an airline;

(3) a railway;

(4) a motor carrier registered under Chapter 643, Transportation Code; or

(5) a common carrier operating under a certificate issued by the Interstate Commerce Commission.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 455, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 705, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.173, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 41.04. REQUIRED INFORMATION. The holder of a carrier permit shall furnish information required by the commission concerning the transportation of liquor.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 455, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 41.05. TRANSPORTATION OF WINE OUT OF STATE. At the request of a holder of a winery permit, a common carrier that does not hold a carrier permit may transport wine from the premises of the holder of the winery permit or from another location where the holder of a winery permit may legally store wine to a destination out of this state, if the common carrier may otherwise legally transport wine and the holder of the winery permit furnishes to the commission any documentation required by the commission concerning the transportation and the receipt of the wine at the destination out of this state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1017, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1989.